src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! # Adjective inflection
!! ----
!! Komi (Zyrian) adjectives compare.

!! Continuation lexicon has been assigned according to <pos/> content


!2018-10-21!LEXICON A_INT_ӦЙ
!2018-10-21!+Use/SpellNoSugg:ӧй A_ ;
!2018-10-21!+Use/NG+Err/Dial:%>эй A_ ;
!2018-10-21!+Use/SpellNoSugg:о%- adjectives-russian-like ;

LEXICON A_RU_NO2J
+Der+Der/Adv+Adv:ӧ ADV_ ;
+Der+Der/Adv+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Adv:%>э ADV_ ;
A_RU_O2J ;
LEXICON A_RU_O2J
+Use/SpellNoSugg:ӧй A_ ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial:%>эй A_ ;
+Use/SpellNoSugg:о%- adjectives ;!This needs flags for compound if there are no hybrids 2025-01-11, e.g., агитационно-синма

LEXICON DENOMINAL_LOCATIVE_ADJECTIVES
@U.Cap.Opt@+Der+Der/LocMod+A+Loc:@U.Cap.Opt@%>са A_ ;

LEXICON DERIVEDADJ
 DERIVEDADJ_IN_VOW ;
 DERIVEDADJ_IN_CONS ;

LEXICON DERIVEDADJ_IN_VOW
+Prp:%>%{ая%} K ;! Case 2021-04-04 adnominal modifiers

LEXICON DERIVEDADJ_IN_CONS
+Loc:%>са K ;! Case 2021-04-04 adnominal modifiers
+Abe:%>тӧм K ;! Case 2021-04-04 adnominal modifiers
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Abe:%>тэм K ;! Case 2021-04-04 adnominal modifiers
+Cmpr:%>ся K ;! Case 2021-04-04 adnominal modifiers
+Der+Der/uvsa+A:%>увса A_ ;
+Der+Der/sajsa+A:%>сайса A_ ;
+Der+Der/pwvstsa+A:%>пӧвстса A_ ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/pwvstsa+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+A:%>певстса A_ ;
+Der+Der/kostsa+A:%>костса A_ ;
+Der+Der/berdsa+A:%>бердса A_ ;
+Der+Der/bwrsa+A:%>бӧрса A_ ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/bwrsa+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+A:%>берса A_ ;
+Der+Der/vesjtsa+A:%>весьтса A_ ;
+Der+Der/vodzsa+A:%>водзса A_ ;
+Der+Der/vyvsa+A:%>вывса A_ ;
+Der+Der/gwgwrsa+A:%>гӧгӧрса A_ ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/gwgwrsa+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+A:%>гегерса A_ ;
+Der+Der/dorsa+A:%>дорса A_ ;




LEXICON A_а
 A_ ;
LEXICON A_PL_а !! CHECK THIS 2026-06-07
 A_ ;
LEXICON A_я
 A_ ;
LEXICON A_ӧсь
 A_ ;
LEXICON A_тӧм
 A_ ;
LEXICON A_са
 A_ ;
LEXICON A_TOPO_са
 A_ ;
LEXICON A_ся
 A_ ;
!LEXICON A-RUS_ADD_
! A_ ;
LEXICON A_RUS_MAIN_
 A_ ;
LEXICON A_RUS_PROP_ !CHECKME
 A_ ;
LEXICON A_PROP_EJ_dial
+Err/Dial A_ ;
LEXICON A_PROP_O2J
 A_RU_O2J ;
LEXICON A_IS_PTC_YSJ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
!+V+Der+Der/ysj: NMN_ ; 2026-07-01
A_ ;


!LEXICON Adj
! A_ ;

LEXICON A_IS_INE_MOD_СА
+Loc: A_ ;
LEXICON A_IS_COMP_MOD_КОДЬ
+Der+Der/kodj+CompMod: A_ ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON A_IS_ABE_MOD_ТӦМ
!2018-10-21!+Der+Der/twm+AbeMod: A_ ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON A_IS_HAB_OBJ_MOD_А
!2018-10-21!+Der+Der/a+HabObjMod: A_ ;
!LEXICON A_IS_TEMP_MOD_СЯ see A_ся
!+Der+Der/TempMod+A: A_ ;

!LEXICON A_IS_PTC_TOM ! 2011-11-15 participle = derivation type; 2023-06-09 verbal derivation 
!+V+Der+Der/twm: A_ ;

LEXICON A_IS_PTC_YSJ
+V+Der+Der/ysj+A: A_ ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON A_IS_PTC_AN !
!2018-10-21!+V+Der+Der/An: A_ ;

LEXICON A_IS_PTC_ANA !
+V+Der+Der/Ana: A_ ;

!LEXICON A_IS_PTC_ӦМ
!+V+Der+Der/wm: A_ ;

LEXICON A_IS_DIM_НИК
+Der+Der/Inik: A_ ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON A_IS_TOM
!2018-10-21! A_IS_TOM ;
LEXICON A_IS_TOM
!+N+Der+Der/twm: A_ ;2026-06-29
A_ ;! The idea was to set up a +Dimin vs +Der/Dimin -type distinction
! for now the existence of the contlexicon tags will serve to make the distinction

!LEXICON A_IS_SUPERL !
!+Superl: A_ ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON A_SUPERL !
!2018-10-21!+Superl: A_ ;

LEXICON A_PRED ! ӧбиднӧ
+Cop: WordEnd ; !


LEXICON A_
!2017-09-19+Attr: # ;
: PredMonAdj ;
: AdjCompar ;
+Der+Der/kodj+A:%>кодь PredMonAdj ;
+Der+Der/kodj+A:%>кодь AdjCompar ;
+Der+Der/In:%>%{иі%}н N_ ;
+Der+Der/lun:%>лун N_ ; !Derivational suffix for A-N
+Der+Der/a:%>%{ая%} ADV_ ; ! Derivation for adjective-to-adverb

LEXICON SUPERL_A_
: PredMonAdj ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX_afterDerivation ; !This is for adjectives without nouns
+Pl:%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX_afterDerivation ; !This is for adjectives without nouns
+Der+Der/kodj+A:%>кодь PredMonAdj ;
+Der+Der/kodj+A:%>кодь AdjCompar ;
+Der+Der/In:%>%{иі%}н N_ ;
+Der+Der/lun:%>лун N_ ; !Derivational suffix for A-N
+Der+Der/a:%>а ADV_ ; ! Derivation for adjective-to-adverb

LEXICON A_PARAGOGIC_V/L !!= * @CODE@ юмов:юмо юмолӧсь
:^л2^Close K ; !! Singular predicative 
:^л2 COP_PL ;
:^л2^Close AdjCompar ;
+Der+Der/kodj+A:^л2^Close%>кодь PredMonAdj ;
+Der+Der/kodj+A:^л2^Close%>кодь AdjCompar ;
+Der+Der/In:^л2%>%{иі%}н N_ ;
+Der+Der/lun:^л2^Close%>лун N_ ; !Derivational suffix for A-N

LEXICON WordEnd_PredMonAdj
+Der+Der/lador+N:%>ладор Noun1 ;
 WordEnd ;
 PredMonAdj ;

LEXICON PredMonAdj
! ABS_ ; ! adjective modifiers etc. Instead of Attr. 2018-10-21
!+Cop+Sg: K ;     2020-10-19
!2017-09-21+Attr: K ;      ! Singular predicative
COP_PL  ; ! Plural predicative.


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
